Mississippi, session 2026, HB240.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the "Historic Courthouse Fund."  The Department of Archives and History shall administer the fund for the purpose of making grants to counties for the maintenance and/or restoration of historic courthouses in Mississippi, as determined by the department.  In order to receive a grant from the fund, a county must provide matching funds in the amount of twenty-five percent (25%) of the grant. (2)  The Department of Archives and History may solicit and accept donations, bequests, devises, gifts and grants of money from individuals, organizations and corporations to be deposited in the Historic Courthouse Fund.  In addition, the department may solicit and accept donations, bequests, devises, gifts and grants of real and personal property, and the board of trustees of the department, in its discretion, may sell the property by public or private sale and shall deposit proceeds derived from the sale into the fund.  The Legislature may appropriate, transfer or otherwise provide additional funds for the fund. (3)  The State Treasurer shall invest all monies in the Historic Courthouse Fund as other state funds are authorized to be invested.  Unexpended amounts in the fund at the end of a fiscal year must remain in the fund and not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned on the unexpended amounts in the fund must be deposited to the credit of the fund. (4)  All funds deposited in the Historic Courthouse Fund must be expended, upon appropriation by the Legislature, by the Department of Archives and History for the purpose of making grants to counties for the maintenance and/or restoration of historic courthouses in Mississippi, as determined by the department. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.